Vermont, session 2025-2026, H155.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 30 V.S.A. § 8005a is amended to read:
§ 8005a. STANDARD OFFER PROGRAM
* * *
(b) Eligibility. To be eligible for a standard offer under this section, a plant
must constitute a qualifying small power production facility under 16 U.S.C.
§ 796(17)(C) and 18 C.F.R. part 292, must not be a net metering system under
VT LEG #380044 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.155
2025 Page 2 of 8
section 219a 8010 of this title, and must be a new standard offer plant. In this
section, “new standard offer plant” means a renewable energy plant that is
located in Vermont, that has a plant capacity of 2.2 MW or less, and that is
commissioned on or after September 30, 2009.
(c) Cumulative capacity. In accordance with this subsection, the
Commission shall issue standard offers to new standard offer plants until a
cumulative plant capacity amount of 127.5 227.5 MW is reached.
(1) Pace. Annually commencing April 1, 2013, the Commission shall
increase the cumulative plant capacity of the Standard Offer Program (the
annual increase) until the 127.5-MW 227.5-MW cumulative plant capacity of
this subsection is reached.
(A) Annual amounts. The amount of the annual increase shall be five
MW for the three years commencing April 1, 2013, 7.5 MW for the three years
commencing April 1, 2016, and 10 MW commencing April 1, 2019, and then
20 MW commencing April 1, 2026.
(B) Blocks. Each year, a portion of the annual increase shall be
reserved for new standard offer plants proposed by Vermont retail electricity
providers (the provider block), and the remainder shall be reserved for new
standard offer plants proposed by persons who are not providers (the
independent developer block).
VT LEG #380044 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.155
2025 Page 3 of 8
(i) The portion of the annual increase reserved for the provider
block shall be 10 percent for the three years commencing April 1, 2013, 15
percent for the three years commencing April 1, 2016, and 20 percent
commencing April 1, 2019.
(ii) If the provider block for a given year is not fully subscribed,
any unsubscribed capacity within that block shall be added to the annual
increase for each following year until that capacity is subscribed and shall be
made available to new standard offer plants proposed by persons who are not
providers.
(iii) If the independent developer block for a given year is not fully
subscribed, any unsubscribed capacity within that block shall be added to the
annual increase for each following year until that capacity is subscribed and:
(I) shall be made available to new standard offer plants
proposed by persons who are not providers; and
(II) may be made available to a provider following a written
request and specific proposal submitted to and approved by the Commission.
[Repealed.]
(C) Adjustment; greenhouse gas reduction credits. The Commission
shall adjust the annual increase to account for greenhouse gas reduction credits
by multiplying the annual increase by one minus the ratio of the prior year’s
greenhouse gas reduction credits to that year’s statewide retail electric sales.
VT LEG #380044 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.155
2025 Page 4 of 8
(i) The amount of the prior year’s greenhouse gas reduction
credits shall be determined in accordance with subdivision subsection 8006a(a)
of this title.
(ii) The adjustment in the annual increase shall be applied
proportionally to the independent developer block and the provider block.
(iii) Greenhouse gas reduction credits used to diminish a
provider’s obligation under section 8004 of this title may be used to adjust the
annual increase under this subsection (c).
* * *
(d) Plants outside cumulative capacity. The following categories of plants
shall not count toward the cumulative capacity amount of subsection (c) of this
section, and the Commission shall make standard offers available to them
provided that they are otherwise eligible for such offers under this section:
(1) Plants using methane derived from an agricultural operation.
(2) New standard offer plants that the Commission determines will have
sufficient benefits to the operation and management of the electric grid or a
provider’s portion thereof because of their design, characteristics, location, or
any other discernible benefit. To enhance the ability of new standard offer
plants to mitigate transmission and distribution constraints, the Commission
shall require Vermont retail electricity providers and companies that own or
operate electric transmission facilities within the State to make sufficient
VT LEG #380044 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.155
2025 Page 5 of 8
information concerning these constraints available to developers who propose
new standard offer plants.
(A) By March 1, 2013, the Commission shall develop a screening
framework or guidelines that will provide developers with adequate
information regarding constrained areas in which generation having particular
characteristics is reasonably likely to provide sufficient benefit to allow the
generation to qualify for eligibility under this subdivision (2).
(B) Once the Commission develops the screening framework or
guidelines under subdivision (2)(A) of this subsection (d), the Commission
shall require Vermont transmission and retail electricity providers to make the
necessary information publicly available in a timely manner, with updates at
least annually.
(C) Nothing in this subdivision (2) shall require the disclosure of
information in contravention of federal law.
(e) Term. The term of a standard offer required by this section shall be 10
to 20 years, except that the term of a standard offer for a plant using solar
power shall be 10 to 25 years.
(f) Price. The categories of renewable energy for which the Commission
shall set standard offer prices shall include at least each of the categories
established pursuant to subdivision (c)(2) of this section. The Commission by
order shall determine and set the price paid to a plant owner for each kWh
VT LEG #380044 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.155
2025 Page 6 of 8
generated under a standard offer required by this section, with a goal of
ensuring timely development at the lowest feasible cost. The Commission
shall not be required to make this determination as a contested case under
3 V.S.A. chapter 25.
* * *
(3) Price determinations. The Commission shall take all actions
necessary to determine the pricing mechanism and implement the pricing
requirements of this subsection (f) no later than on or before March 1, 2013 for
effect on April 1, 2013. Annually thereafter, the Commission shall review the
determinations previously made under this subsection to decide whether they
should be modified in any respect in order to achieve the goal and
requirements of this subsection. Any such modification shall be effective on a
prospective basis commencing one month after it has been made. Once a
pricing determination made or modified under this subsection goes into effect,
subsequently executed standard offer contracts shall comply with the most
recently effective determination.
* * *
(g) Qualifying existing agricultural plants. Notwithstanding any other
provision of this section, on and after June 8, 2010, a standard offer shall be
available for a qualifying existing plant as defined in Sec. 3 of No. 159 of the
Acts of the 2009 Adj. Sess. (2010) (Act 159) 2010 Acts and Resolves No. 159,
VT LEG #380044 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.155
2025 Page 7 of 8
Sec. 3. The provisions of subdivision 8005(b)(2) of this title, as they existed
on June 4, 2010, the effective date of Act 159 2010 Acts and Resolves
No. 159, shall govern a standard offer under this subsection. Standard offers
for these plants shall not be subject to subsection (c) of this section (cumulative
capacity; new standard offer plants).
* * *
(s) Solar only allocations.
(1) Notwithstanding other provisions of this section to the contrary,
beginning on April 1, 2026, the Commission shall allocate the new standard
offer awards to new solar, wind, and hydroelectric power plants only. Of the
annual capacity awards under this subsection (s), two MW shall be allocated to
community solar projects.
(2) As used in this section, “community solar project” means a solar
plant owned by its members or an entity controlled by its members.
(3) The Commission shall establish a price cap on projects equal to the
price of the highest-cost, similarly sized solar project from the Standard Offer
Program from the preceding 12 months.
(4) If the annual allocation for community solar is not fully subscribed,
the Commission shall allocate the unsubscribed capacity to new standard offer
plants other than community solar.
VT LEG #380044 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.155
2025 Page 8 of 8
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380044 v.1